New Jersey, session 221, A3991.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. a. As used in this section, instructional certificate means a certificate of eligibility, certificate of eligibility with advanced standing, provisional certificate, or standard instructional certificate. b. The State Board of Education shall authorize a general science endorsement to an instructional certificate.  The endorsement shall authorize the holder to teach any science course in grades nine through 12. c. In order to be eligible for an instructional certificate with a general science endorsement established pursuant to subsection b. of this section, a candidate shall: (1) possess a bachelors degree or a masters degree in biology, chemistry, physics or a related field, as determined by the Commissioner of Education; (2) achieve a grade point average of 3.0 or higher on a scale of 4.0, or its equivalent; (3) pass a commissioner-approved basic skills test; (4) pass a commissioner-approved subject matter test, if applicable; and (5) meet any other requirements as established by the commissioner. d. A teacher who currently holds a biological science, chemistry, earth science, physical science, or physics endorsement to an instructional certificate and meets the requirements established pursuant to subsection c. of this section shall be authorized to apply for an instructional certificate with a general science endorsement. 2. The State Board of Education shall adopt, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), the rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this act. 3. This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full school year following the date of enactment.